Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.325

Costs of implementing RCW 15.28.103.

The costs incurred by the department of agriculture associated with the implementation of RCW 15.28.103 shall be paid for by the commission.

[ 2003 c 396 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.